Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle D. Distributions.

§79-4-6.40.
Distributions to shareholders.

A board of directors may authorize and the corporation may make distributions to its shareholders subject to restriction by the articles of incorporation and the limitation in subsection (c).

If the board of directors does not fix the record date for determining shareholders entitled to a distribution (other than one involving a purchase, redemption or other acquisition of the corporation’s shares), it is the date the board of directors authorizes the distribution.

No distribution may be made if, after giving it effect:

The corporation would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of business; or

The corporation’s total assets would be less than the sum of its total liabilities plus (unless the articles of incorporation permit otherwise) the amount that would be needed, if the corporation were to be dissolved at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights upon dissolution of shareholders whose preferential rights are superior to those receiving the distribution.

In all other cases, as of (i) the date the distribution is authorized if the payment occurs within one hundred twenty (120) days after the date of authorization, or (ii) the date the payment is made if it occurs more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date of authorization.

The board of directors may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subsection (c) either on financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances or on a fair valuation or other method that is reasonable in the circumstances.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g), the effect of a distribution under subsection (c) is measured;

In the case of distribution by purchase, redemption or other acquisition of the corporation’s shares, as of the earlier of (i) the date money or other property is transferred or debt incurred by the corporation, or (ii) the date the shareholder ceases to be a shareholder with respect to the acquired shares;

In the case of any other distribution of indebtedness, as of the date the indebtedness is distributed; and

A corporation’s indebtedness to a shareholder incurred by reason of a distribution made in accordance with this section is at parity with the corporation’s indebtedness to its general, unsecured creditors except to the extent subordinated by agreement.

Indebtedness of a corporation, including indebtedness issued as a distribution, is not considered a liability for purposes of determinations under subsection (c) if its terms provide that payment of principal and interest are made only if and to the extent that payment of a distribution to shareholders could then be made under this section. If the indebtedness is issued as a distribution, each payment of principal or interest is treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the date the payment is actually made.

This section shall not apply to distributions in liquidation under Article 14 (Section 79-4-14.01 et seq.).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 6.40; Laws, 1988, ch. 369, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

The 2001 amendment added (h).

Record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of meeting, to demand special meeting, to vote, or to take other action, see § 79-4-1.07.

Applicability of this section to reacquisition, redemption or conversion of shares, see § 79-4-6.03.

Record date for determining shareholders entitled to a share dividend, see § 79-4-6.40.

Certain shareholder agreements as to authorization or making of distributions, although otherwise inconsistent with act, permitted subject to limitations in this section, see § 79-4-7.32.

Director’s liability for unlawful distributions, see § 79-4-8.33.

Applicability of this section to sale, lease, exchange or other disposition of all, or substantially all, property of corporation other then in regular course of business that constitutes a distribution, see § 79-4-12.02.

Payment by corporation, pursuant to order directing buyout of shareholder petitioning to dissolve corporation whose shares are not listed or regularly traded, as subject to provisions of this section, see § 79-4-14.34.

Distribution to shareholders during voluntary dissolution of corporation, see §§ 79-4-14.01 et seq.

In order to set aside a conveyance of real estate by a bankrupt corporation to its stockholder, the trustee in bankruptcy must prove the insolvency of the corporation following, and as a result of, the transfer. Alcott Co. v. Raphael, 275 F.2d 551, 1960 U.S. App. LEXIS 5200 (5th Cir. Miss. 1960).

Cancellation and surrender of notes, given by stockholders for purchase of additional stock, by president of corporation without authorization of the board of directors and while corporation was insolvent, less than one month before filing of petition in bankruptcy, was ineffectual to discharge liability of stockholder for balance due on stock as against trustee in bankruptcy. Frazier v. Zachariah, 174 Miss. 378, 164 So. 893, 1936 Miss. LEXIS 188 (Miss. 1936).

One year statute of limitations on suits for penalties does not bar action under this section [Code 1942, § 5328]. Metzger v. Joseph, 111 Miss. 385, 71 So. 645, 1916 Miss. LEXIS 309 (Miss. 1916).

This section [Code 1942, § 5328] is not penal but remedial. Metzger v. Joseph, 111 Miss. 385, 71 So. 645, 1916 Miss. LEXIS 309 (Miss. 1916).

State banking law did not repeal this section [Code 1942, § 5328] as applicable to banks. Metzger v. Joseph, 111 Miss. 385, 71 So. 645, 1916 Miss. LEXIS 309 (Miss. 1916).

Corporation’s capital cannot be withdrawn by stockholders until all debts are paid. Kimbrough v. Davies, 104 Miss. 722, 61 So. 697, 1913 Miss. LEXIS 78 (Miss. 1913).

Liability of stockholders for withdrawn capital necessary to pay creditors is several. Kimbrough v. Davies, 104 Miss. 722, 61 So. 697, 1913 Miss. LEXIS 78 (Miss. 1913).

This section [Code 1942, § 5328] does not prevent recovery of portion of corporation’s capital withdrawn for distribution among stockholders and necessary to pay debts. Kimbrough v. Davies, 104 Miss. 722, 61 So. 697, 1913 Miss. LEXIS 78 (Miss. 1913).

Dividend rights in surplus of new consolidated corporation resulting from reduction of capital stock of former constituent corporations. 28 A.L.R.2d 1177.

Reduction of capital stock and distribution of capital assets on reduction. 35 A.L.R.2d 1149.

Modern status of rules governing allocations of stock dividends or splits between principal and income. 81 A.L.R.3d 876.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 1019.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Form 263.1 (complaint by judgment creditor against sole stockholder receiving distributions of corporate property causing corporation to become insolvent).

22 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 593, Wrongful Failure of Corporate Directors to Declare Dividend.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 543, 545.